Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF489.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2591SV (1) 91 th/ns S.F. 489 Section 1. Section 307.22, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 7. Ensure equal representation between 3 governmental and nongovernmental entities in developing 4 statewide urban design specifications. 5